South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S933.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Legislative compensation SECTION 1.    Section 2-3-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 2-3-20.    (A) Beginning with the 128th General Assembly, members of the General Assembly shall annually receive as legislative compensation fifteen thousand dollars at a daily remuneration rate in accordance with Article III, Section 9 of the State Constitution and an in-district legislative service allowance of thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars as adjusted pursuant to subsection (C). Members of the General Assembly shall also receive mileage at the rate provided for by law for the actual distance traveled in the most direct route going to and returning from their homes on weekend adjournments of the General Assembly at the place where the sessions of the General Assembly are held. The terms of this provision shall be subject to limitations imposed by the State Constitution. (B) The President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, and the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House shall receive, in addition, such amounts as may annually appear in the state appropriations act. (C) The legislative compensation and the in-district legislative service allowance provided for in subsection (A) shall be adjusted biennially after elections for the House of Representatives by an amount equal to the increase of the consumer price index using the chained methodology during the two previous years not to exceed five percent. The Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Authority shall calculate the biennial adjustment, publish it on its website, and transmit the amount of the adjustment to the Senate and the House of Representatives prior to the second Tuesday in January in the appropriate years. (D) For the members of the 128th General Assembly, to be eligible to receive the increased compensation, as compared to the 126th General Assembly, set forth in subsection (A), as adjusted by subsection (C), a member must file a written statement accepting the increase with the Clerk of the House of Representatives or the Clerk of the Senate, as applicable. A member who does not file a statement of acceptance remains entitled to receive compensation in the same amount as a member of the 126th General Assembly received. A member's filing or failure to file a statement of acceptance may not be based on, conditioned upon, or affected by the member's vote for the increase allowed in subsection (A). Severability SECTION 2.    If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________